Montana, session 2025, HB706.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Attorney fees. (1) When a party who has prevailed against the state
government seeks a claim for attorney fees from a court based on applicable legal authority, the party shall
show:
(a) an engagement letter or representation agreement from the outset of the engagement stating
the scope of representation and the attorneys' hourly rates;
(b) daily documentation of work performed showing the time spent on specific tasks in increments
of time less than one-quarter hour for each entry as reflected in invoices submitted to the party from counsel
within 60 days of the work performed; and
(c) proof of payment of the invoices within 30 days of receipt.
(2) The required showings in subsection (1) do not apply to a party that has prevailed against the
state government if the prevailing party had at the end of the most recent fiscal year income and assets that
together did not exceed $250,000.
(3) For any disclosure required by subsections (1)(a) or (1)(b), a party may redact information
protected by attorney-client privilege.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 25, chapter 10, part 3, and the provisions of Title 25, chapter 10, part 3, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 706